District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-703

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 4, 31 DCR 6088
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(d), 37 DCR 4815
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 98, 51 DCR 881
Oct. 22 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-603.